Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2904
Affected animal, herd, or flock, defined.

Affected animal, herd, or flock means an animal, herd, or flock which contains an animal infected with or exposed to a dangerous disease.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 4.